apertium-pl-csb.csb.dix
    <pardef n="sã__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sebie</l>
          <r>sã<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>sã<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sobie</l>
          <r>sã<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>sobie</l>
          <r>sã<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="emph"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sã</l>
          <r>sã<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>so</l>
          <r>sã<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sebie</l>
          <r>sã<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="emph"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sobie</l>
          <r>sã<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sobą</l>
          <r>sã<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ja/czis__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czis</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czis</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kôs</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czés</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czés</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czégòs</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czégòs</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czis</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czégòs</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czichs</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czichs</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czis</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czégòs</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kąs</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czés</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kąs</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czims</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czims</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czis</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czims</l>
          <r>czis<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="atlantëc/czi__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>czi<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__atlantëcczi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kò</l>
          <r>czi<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="krót/czi__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>czi<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__atlantëcczi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kò</l>
          <r>czi<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wiôl/dżi__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>dżi<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__wiôldżi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gò</l>
          <r>dżi<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dłu/dżi__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>dżi<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__wiôldżi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gò</l>
          <r>dżi<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kaszëbs/czi__adj">
      <e>
        <i/>
        <par n="atlantëc/czi__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kù</l>
          <r>czi<s n="adj"/><s n="po"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wersëj/ô__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ô</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ô</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óm</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ô<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wers/ëjô__n">
      <e>
        <i>ëj</i>
        <par n="wersëj/ô__n"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>ëj</r>
        </p>
        <par n="wersëj/ô__n"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="jaczis"><i>ja</i><par n="ja/czis__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sã"><i></i><par n="sã__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="filologijô"><i>filologij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geòlogijô"><i>geòlogij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="techologijô"><i>techologij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Wikipedijô"><i>Wikipedij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fòtografijô"><i>fòtografij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="psychòlogijô"><i>psychòlogij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pòlitologijô"><i>pòlitologij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filozofijô"><i>filozofij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekònomijô"><i>ekònomij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="archeòlogijô"><i>archeòlogij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antropòlogijô"><i>antropòlogij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astronomijô"><i>astronomij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geògrafijô"><i>geògrafij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terminologijô"><i>terminologij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telewizëjô"><i>telewiz</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frazeòlogijô"><i>frazeòlogij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kòmpanijô"><i>kòmpanij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tradicëjô"><i>tradic</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akademijô"><i>akademij</i><par n="wersëj/ô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aristokracëjô"><i>aristokrac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deklamacëjô"><i>deklamac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eksploatacëjô"><i>eksploatac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="funkcëjô"><i>funkc</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inkrustacëjô"><i>inkrustac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanalizacëjô"><i>kanalizac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kongregacëjô"><i>kongregac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kristalizacëjô"><i>kristalizac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mutacëjô"><i>mutac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peticëjô"><i>petic</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prowincëjô"><i>prowinc</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="remilitarëzacëjô"><i>remilitarëzac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="satisfakcëjô"><i>satisfakc</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="symulacëjô"><i>symulac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="emigracëjô"><i>emigrac</i><par n="wers/ëjô__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akadëjsczi"><i>akadëjs</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="asturëjsczi"><i>asturëjs</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="białorusczi"><i>białorus</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dolnosaksóńsczi"><i>dolnosaksóńs</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="friùlsczi"><i>friùls</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="indonezëjsczi"><i>indonezëjs</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="khmersczi"><i>khmers</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kùrdëjsczi"><i>kùrdëjs</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="macedońsczi"><i>macedońs</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mòłdawsczi"><i>mòłdaws</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="persczi"><i>pers</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rusczi"><i>rus</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stôroprësczi"><i>stôroprës</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tatarsczi"><i>tatars</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="walëjsczi"><i>walëjs</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="litewsczi"><i>litews</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kùjawskô-pòmòrsczi"><i>kùjawskô-pòmòrs</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pòmòrsczi"><i>pòmòrs</i><par n="kaszëbs/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="atlantëcczi"><i>atlantëc</i><par n="atlantëc/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lëdzczi"><i>lëdz</i><par n="atlantëc/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="akademicczi"><i>akademic</i><par n="atlantëc/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gardzczi"><i>gardz</i><par n="atlantëc/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="azjatëcczi"><i>azjatëc</i><par n="atlantëc/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amatorsczi"><i>amators</i><par n="atlantëc/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="krótczi"><i>krót</i><par n="krót/czi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dłudżi"><i>dłu</i><par n="dłu/dżi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wiôldżi"><i>wiôl</i><par n="wiôl/dżi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blësczi"><i>blës</i><par n="krót/czi__adj"/></e>
